Utah statutes.
7-5-2.   Permit required to engage in trust business -- Exceptions.

(1)  No trust company shall accept any appointment to act in any agency or fiduciary capacity, including that of personal representative, executor, administrator, conservator, guardian, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee under order or judgment of any court or by authority of any law of this state or as trustee for any purpose permitted by law or otherwise engage in the trust business in this state, unless and until it has obtained from the commissioner a permit to act under this chapter.  This provision does not apply to any bank or other corporation authorized to engage and lawfully engaged in the trust business in this state before July 1, 1981.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits:

(a)  any corporation organized under Title 16, Chapter 6a or 10a, from acting as trustee of any employee benefit trust established for the employees of the corporation or the employees of one or more other corporations affiliated with the corporation;

(b)  any corporation organized under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and owned or controlled by a charitable, benevolent, eleemosynary, or religious organization from acting as a trustee for that organization or members of that organization but not offering trust services to the general public;

(c)  any corporation organized under Title 16, Chapter 6a or 10a, from holding in a fiduciary capacity the controlling shares of another corporation but not offering trust services to the general public; or

(d)  any depository institution from holding in an agency or fiduciary capacity individual retirement accounts or Keogh plan accounts established under Section 401(a) or 408(a) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

